Tennessee statutes. Title 42 Aeronautics
Chapter 8

Heliports

42-8-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Heliport” means land from which helicopters take off and land. “Heliport” does not include heliports operated by a health care institution as defined in § 68-11-1602 or land on which a helicopter makes a landing required by an emergency. “Heliport” also does not include land that is on private property used for the landing of a privately owned and operated helicopter for private, non-commercial purposes on a limited basis that in no way is ever used by or for commercial helicopter touring as commercial helicopter touring is defined in § 42-1-301; and

“Tourist resort county” means a county having more than five percent (5%) of its territory located within the boundaries of a national park established pursuant to 16 U.S.C. § 403.

Acts 1992, ch. 727, § 2; 2009, ch. 57, § 1; 2010, ch. 965, § 1.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment added the last sentence of the definition of “heliport”.

The 2010 amendment substituted “private, non-commercial purposes” for “private purposes” in the last sentence of the definition of “heliport”.

Effective Dates. Acts 2009, ch. 57, § 2. April 14, 2009.

Acts 2010, ch. 965, § 2. May 26, 2010.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 93-04 (1/13/93).

42-8-102. Certain land not to be used as heliport — Heliports on such land.

Land in a tourist resort county within nine (9) miles of the boundary of a national park established pursuant to 16 U.S.C. § 403 cannot be used as a heliport.

The department of transportation shall not issue or renew licenses pursuant to chapter 2 of this title for any heliport located on land subject to the prohibition in subsection (a), except that licenses may be renewed for heliports allowed to continue to operate under § 42-8-103.

Acts 1992, ch. 727, § 3.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 93-04 (1/13/93).

42-8-103. Violations — Heliport deemed nuisance — Abatement, removal, conformity.

Notwithstanding §13-7-208 or any other law to the contrary, a heliport operating as of April 23, 1992, that is in violation of §42-8-102(a) is declared a public nuisance and shall be abated, removed or changed to conform with this chapter by July 1, 1994. Such heliports may continue to operate until that date provided:

The heliport is not extended or expanded; and

If the use of the land or any portion thereof as a heliport is discontinued for a period of six (6) months or changed, any future use of the land is in conformity with this chapter.

Acts 1992, ch. 727, § 4.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 93-04 (1/13/93).

42-8-104. Violations — Heliport deemed nuisance — Private right of action.

Any heliport operated in violation of this chapter is deemed a public nuisance, causing irreparable injury to the state, the county in which the heliport is located, municipalities located in that county and the residents of the county. In addition to any other remedies or rights of action possessed by any person or governmental unit, persons who reside on land subject to the prohibitions in this chapter have a private right of action against a person operating a heliport in violation of this chapter, and have the right to seek injunctive relief as allowed by law, to recover damages for nuisance, and to recover costs and attorney's fees if the resident is the prevailing party.

Acts 1992, ch. 727, § 5.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 93-04 (1/13/93).

42-8-105. Applicability — Stricter standards.

This chapter shall not affect existing or future land use restrictions adopted by an incorporated city or town in a tourist resort county greater than those stated in this chapter.

This chapter does not apply to any county that has countywide zoning. If a county adopts countywide zoning after April 23, 1992, then this chapter shall not be applicable to such county.

Notwithstanding subsection (b), this chapter shall be applicable in premier type tourist resorts as defined in § 67-6-103, and located in a tourist resort county as defined in § 42-8-101.

Acts 1992, ch. 727, §§ 6, 7; 2007, ch. 227, § 2.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment added (c).

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, ch. 227, § 3. July 1, 2007.

Attorney General Opinions. Constitutionality, OAG 93-04 (1/13/93).